Arkansas, session 2025, HB1804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-301(3)(B), concerning the levy of the
sales tax, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(ix)(a) The gross receipts tax levied by this
chapter does not apply to vegetation line management services performed by
mechanical or manual means in a substation, utility distribution or
transmission line easement, or right-of-way.
(b) As used in this subdivision (3)(B)(ix):
(1) "Brush" means:
(A) The trimmings from a tree; or
(B) A woody species that if left
to grow would grow into a tree; and
(2) "Vegetation line management
*JLL309*
03/14/2025 2:59:35 PM JLL309

HB1804
services" includes without limitation:
(A) The services of tree and brush
trimming or removal from a floor, side wall, overhead, or structure;
(B) Easement or right-of-way
clearing;
(C) Tree, brush, wood waste, or
debris removal or disposal, including without limitation by mulching,
chipping, shredding, brush hogging, mowing, stump grinding, hauling, or
pickup;
(D) Chemical or herbicide
application or spraying, including without limitation stump and vine
treatment; and
(E) Trimming of vines or
vegetation from utility structures, including without limitation power lines,
gas lines, posts, poles, guy wires, pole braces, meters, and conductors.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.


















03/14/2025 2:59:35 PM JLL309